Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,205
Actions against state; adjudicated claims; certified statement to Legislature; when transmitted.

On the first day of each regular session of the Legislature, the clerks of the several district courts shall transmit a full and complete statement of all claims adjudicated in the courts during the previous year, certified by the clerk and signed by the judge of such court, showing the claimant, the amounts claimed, and the judgment rendered for or against the claimant.

Laws 1877, § 5, p. 20;

R.S.1913, § 1181;

C.S.1922, § 1104;

C.S.1929, § 27-323;

R.S.1943, § 24-323;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-323;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 18.